Utah statutes.
75-5-420.   Conservators -- Title by appointment.
(1) The appointment of a conservator vests in him title as trustee to all
property of the protected person, presently held or thereafter acquired,
including title to any property previously held for the protected person by
custodians or attorneys-in-fact, except for property held pursuant to any
uniform gifts to minors act or provisions.
(2)  The appointment of a conservator is not a transfer or alienation within
the meaning of general provisions of any federal or state statute or
regulation, insurance policy, pension plan, contract, will, or trust
instrument imposing restrictions upon or penalties for transfer or alienation
by the protected person of his rights or interest, but this section does not
restrict the ability of persons to make specific provision by contract or
dispositive instrument relating to a conservator.
